Washington statutes.
RCW 9.18.130

Collusion to prevent competitive bidding—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person for himself or herself or as an agent or officer of any other person, persons, or corporation to in any manner enter into collusion or an understanding with any other person, persons, or corporation to prevent or eliminate full and unrestricted competition upon any public work or improvement mentioned in RCW 9.18.120.

(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 16; 1921 c 12 s 2; RRS s 2333-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.